Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4675.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1164c. (1) By not later than June 1, 2027, the department shall develop or adopt, and make available to public schools, a list of model programs of instruction on cursive as a type of penmanship and guidance on how instruction on cursive as a type of penmanship can be incorporated into state standards to fulfill the credit requirements of the Michigan merit standard under sections 1278a and 1278b. (2) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy is strongly encouraged to incorporate 1 of the model programs of instruction into the curriculum offered by schools operated by the board or board of directors. If the list of model programs of instruction described in subsection (1) is developed or adopted by the department before the beginning of the 2026-2027 school year, the board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy is strongly encouraged to incorporate 1 of the model programs of instruction in the curriculum offered by schools operated by the board or board of directors beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.